Utah statutes.
63H-4-103.   Executive director -- Powers and duties.

(1) (a)  The members shall appoint an executive director who is an employee of the authority, but who is not a member of the authority.

(b)  The executive director serves at the pleasure of the members and receives compensation as set by the members and approved by the governor.

(2)  The executive director shall:

(a)  administer, manage, and direct the affairs and activities of the authority in accordance with the policies, control, and direction of the members;

(b)  approve all accounts for allowable expenses of the authority or of any of its employees and expenses incidental to the operation of the authority;

(c)  attend the meetings of the authority;

(d)  keep a record of the proceedings of the authority;

(e)  maintain and be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the authority; and

(f)  perform other duties as directed by the members in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

